Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1645
Contract or evidence of indebtedness; rights of parties; invalid agreements.

If the person to whom educational services are to be rendered or furnished by a private postsecondary career school is a resident of this state at the time any contract relating to payment for such services, any note, instrument, or other evidence of indebtedness relating to payment for such services, or any note, instrument, or other evidence of indebtedness relating thereto is entered into, sections 85-1645 to 85-1649 shall govern the rights of the parties to such contract or evidence of indebtedness. The following agreements entered into in connection with the contract or the giving of such evidence of indebtedness shall be invalid:

(1) That the law of another state shall apply;

(2) That the maker or any person liable on such contract or evidence of indebtedness consents to the jurisdiction of another state;

(3) That another person is authorized to confess judgment on such contract or evidence of indebtedness; and

(4) That fixes venue.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 49;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 44;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2849;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 45.